test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ísur
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: ís
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ísi
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: ís
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ísar
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ísar
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ísum
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ísa
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ísurin
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ísin
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: ísinum
    ísur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: ísins
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ísarnir
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ísarnar
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ísunum
    ísur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ísanna
